Washington statutes.
RCW 9.51.050

Disclosing transaction of grand jury.

Every judge, grand juror, prosecuting attorney, clerk, stenographer, or other officer who, except in the due discharge of his or her official duty, shall disclose the fact that a presentment has been made or indictment found or ordered against any person, before such person shall be in custody; and every grand juror, clerk, or stenographer who, except when lawfully required by a court or officer, shall disclose any evidence adduced before the grand jury, or any proceeding, discussion, or vote of the grand jury or any member thereof, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 310; 1909 c 249 s 126; Code 1881 s 991; 1854 p 111 s 56; RRS s 2378.]